Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF358.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin CONSTITUTIONAL AMENDMENT PROPOSED.new text end new text begin An amendment to the Minnesota Constitution is proposed to the people. If the amendment is adopted, article V, section 2, will read: new text end Sec. 2. The term of office for the governor and lieutenant governor is four years and until a successor is chosen and qualified. Each shall have attained the age of 25 years and, shall have been a bona fide resident of the state for one year next preceding his election, and shall be a citizen of the United States.new text begin A person elected twice to the office of governor is no longer an eligible candidate for the office.new text end Sec. 2. new text begin SUBMISSION TO VOTERS.new text end new text begin (a) The proposed amendment must be submitted to the people at the 2026 general election. The question submitted must be: new text end new text begin "Shall the Minnesota Constitution be amended to limit a governor to two terms? new text end new text begin Yes . new text end new text begin No . new text end new text begin " new text end new text begin (b) Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 204D.15, subdivision 1, the title for the question submitted to the people under paragraph (a) shall be "A constitutional amendment to place term limits on the office of governor." new text end Sec. 3. new text begin APPLICABILITY.new text end new text begin Elections prior to the 2026 general election must be included in enforcing the limits imposed by the amendment in this act. new text end